Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.005

Definitions.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this title.

(1) "Branch" means an established manned place of business or a manned mobile facility or other manned facility of an association, other than the principal office, at which deposits may be taken.

(2) "Depositor" means a person who deposits money in an association.

(3) "Domestic association" means a savings and loan association which is incorporated under the laws of this state.

(4) "Federal association" means a savings and loan association which is incorporated under federal law.

(5) "Foreign association" means a savings and loan association organized under the laws of another state.

(6)(a) "Member," in a mutual association, means a depositor or any other person who is a member of a class of persons granted membership rights by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(b) "Member," in a stock association, means a stockholder or any other person who is a member of a class of persons granted membership rights by the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(7) "Mutual association" means an association formed without authority to issue stock.

(8) "Savings and loan association," "savings association" or "association," unless otherwise restricted, means a domestic or foreign association and includes a stock or a mutual association.

(9) "Stock association" means an association formed with the authority to issue stock.

(10) "Department" means department of financial institutions.

(11) "Director" means director of financial institutions.

[ 1994 c 92 s 414; 1982 c 3 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.